Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 4. HEALTH FACILITIES

SUBTITLE C. LOCAL HOSPITALS

CHAPTER 263. COUNTY HOSPITALS AND OTHER HEALTH FACILITIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 263.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0820, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 263.001. TWO OR MORE COUNTIES MAY JOIN. (a) Two or more adjacent counties may act together to carry out the purposes of this chapter and construct one or more hospitals for their joint use as provided by this chapter for a single county if:

(1) each of the counties has fewer than 15,000 inhabitants; and

(2) the executive commissioner approves.

(b) The counties acting together have the same powers and liabilities under this chapter as a single county.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0821, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 263.002. ADDITIONAL HOSPITAL. A county may maintain more than one county hospital if considered advisable by the commissioners court of the county and approved by the executive commissioner.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0822, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. ESTABLISHING, ENLARGING, SELLING, AND CLOSING COUNTY HOSPITALS

Sec. 263.021. ESTABLISHING OR ENLARGING HOSPITAL ON PETITION; SUBMISSION OF BOND PROPOSITION. (a) The commissioners court of a county may establish a county hospital or any medical or other health facility or enlarge an existing hospital or facility for the care and treatment of persons who are sick or injured in accordance with this subchapter.

(b) Ten percent or more of the qualified property taxpaying voters of a county may petition the commissioners court of the county to establish or enlarge a county hospital or any medical or other health facility.

(c) A petition may not be presented to the commissioners court during the 12-month period succeeding the date on which a petition under this section was last presented to the court unless the county does not own a hospital.

(d) On proper petition, the commissioners court shall, within the period designated in the petition, submit to the qualified voters of the county at a special or regular election the proposition of issuing bonds in the amount designated in the petition to establish or enlarge the hospital or facility.

(e) The commissioners court may not submit to the voters a bond proposition to establish or enlarge a county hospital or facility more than twice during any 12-month period.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.022. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMISSIONERS COURT AFTER PASSAGE OF BOND PROPOSITION. (a) If a bond proposition under Section 263.021 is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the election, the commissioners court of the county shall establish or enlarge a hospital or medical or other health facility as provided in the proposition and maintain the hospital or facility.

(b) In establishing, enlarging, or maintaining a hospital or facility, the commissioners court may:

(1) purchase or lease real or personal property or acquire real property and easements to real property by condemnation;

(2) purchase or construct any necessary buildings;

(3) make necessary improvements, repairs, and alterations to an existing building;

(4) impose property taxes in the county for all necessary expenditures related to the hospital or facility, including maintenance expenses;

(5) issue county bonds to provide funds to establish, enlarge, and equip the hospital or facility or make any necessary permanent improvements in connection with the hospital or facility; and

(6) accept and hold a grant or devise of land or a gift or bequest of money or personal property in trust for the county and apply the principal or income, or both, for the benefit of the hospital or facility and in accordance with the terms of the gift.

(c) Subject to this chapter, the commissioners court may purchase or lease real or personal property, or both, in an adjacent county if the court considers the purchase or lease necessary for hospital purposes. The commissioners court may not acquire real property in an adjacent county by condemnation.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.023. CONSTRUCTION OF HOSPITAL TO AVOID INADEQUATE CARE IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) The commissioners court of a county shall provide for the construction of a county hospital if:

(1) the county has a municipality with more than 10,000 inhabitants as ascertained by the court in the manner determined by a resolution of the court; and

(2) the county does not have a county hospital or the county hospital is inadequate.

(b) The commissioners court shall provide for the construction of the hospital within six months after the date the number of inhabitants of the municipality exceeds 10,000 except that the executive commissioner may, for good cause, extend this period.

(c) The hospital must have a room or ward for the care of confinement cases and a room or ward for the temporary care of persons suffering from mental or nervous disease.

(d) The hospital must have separate buildings for persons suffering from tuberculosis and other communicable diseases.

(e) Sufficient accommodations shall be added to the hospital as needed to take care of persons in the county who are sick or injured.

(f) If adequate funds for the issuance of county warrants and scrip for the construction of the hospital are not available from the county, the commissioners court shall submit, either at a special election called for the purpose or at a regular election, the proposition of the issuance of county bonds for the construction of the hospital. If the proposition is not approved by a majority vote at the election, the court shall, on petition of 10 percent or more of the qualified voters of the county, resubmit the proposition.

(g) A petition may not be presented to the commissioners court if a petition has been presented to the court in the preceding 12 months.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0823, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 263.024. HOSPITAL REVENUE BONDS. (a) A county may issue revenue bonds for:

(1) acquiring, constructing, repairing, equipping, or renovating buildings and improvements for county hospital purposes; or

(2) acquiring land for county hospital purposes.

(b) The county may issue bonds to refund previously issued revenue bonds.

(c) The revenue bonds shall be payable from and secured by a pledge of all or a part of the revenues of the county derived from the operation of the hospital. The bonds may be additionally secured by a mortgage or deed of trust lien on all or part of the county's hospital property.

(d) The revenue bonds must be issued in accordance with Sections 264.042-264.047(a), 264.048, and 264.049, and with the effect specified by Section 264.050.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.025. HOSPITAL OPERATING FUNDS USED FOR IMPROVEMENTS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. The commissioners court of a county with a population of 24,000 or more but less than 24,500 or a population of 24,700 or more but less than 27,000 may use excess money in the county hospital operating fund for making permanent improvements to the county hospital and for the payment of county bonds issued for the construction and improvement of a county hospital facility.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 71, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 71, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 263.026. HEALTH UNIT OR CENTER IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION GREATER THAN 100,000. (a) The commissioners court of a county with a population of more than 100,000 that has a county hospital may acquire sites and construct or otherwise acquire buildings to use for county public health units or public health centers as part of the county hospital system. The commissioners court may locate a health unit or center anywhere in the county.

(b) Payments for the sites or buildings shall be made from the county permanent improvement fund. To pay for a site or building for a health unit or center, the commissioners court may:

(1) issue negotiable bonds and impose taxes to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds in accordance with Subtitles A and C, Title 9, Government Code;

(2) issue time warrants and impose taxes to pay the principal of and interest on the time warrants in accordance with Subchapter C, Chapter 262, Local Government Code; or

(3) by order issue certificates of indebtedness and impose taxes to pay the principal of and interest on the certificates in accordance with this section.

(c) The certificates of indebtedness must:

(1) mature not later than 35 years after the date of the certificates; and

(2) be signed by the county judge and attested by the county clerk, either by their actual or facsimile signatures as provided by the order of issuance.

(d) The interest on certificates of indebtedness may be evidenced by interest coupons at the discretion of the commissioners court. The interest coupons must be executed by the facsimile signatures of the county judge and county clerk.

(e) The certificates of indebtedness and the record relating to their issuance shall be submitted to the attorney general for examination. If the certificates are issued in accordance with the Texas Constitution and this section, the attorney general shall approve the certificates and the comptroller shall register the certificates. If the certificates are registered, they are incontestable after they are delivered to the purchasers.

(f) The commissioners court shall sell the certificates of indebtedness for not less than their par value plus accrued interest. The commissioners court shall impose a continuing annual ad valorem tax sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the certificates as each becomes due and payable.

(g) Certificates of indebtedness issued under this section are negotiable instruments.

(h) The commissioners court may issue refunding bonds to refund bonds and certificates issued under this section, subject to state law applicable to refunding bonds issued by counties. The commissioners court may issue the refunding bonds without notice or a referendum.

(i) The commissioners court may issue refunding bonds to refund time warrants issued under this section.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1064, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 263.027. APPROVAL OF CONSTRUCTION OR REPAIR. If requested by the commissioners court of a county, the executive commissioner must approve plans for the construction, alteration, or repair of a hospital or facility under this chapter before the construction, alteration, or repair may begin.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0824, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 263.028. CONTRACT FOR CARE. (a) The commissioners court of a county that does not have a municipality with a population of more than 10,000 may contract with a hospital in the county, an incorporated society or municipality in the county that maintains a hospital, or an adjacent county for the care of residents of the county who are sick or injured.

(b) The term of the contract may not exceed one year.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.029. SALE OR LEASE OF HOSPITAL. (a) A county may sell or lease all or part of a county hospital or medical or other health facility operated by the county, including real property, if the commissioners court of the county, by order entered in the minutes of the court, finds that the sale or lease is in the best interest of the county.

(b) The commissioners court shall set a time and place for a hearing on the proposed sale or lease. The date of the hearing may not be earlier than the 16th day or later than the 30th day from the date of the order.

(c) The county clerk, immediately after the time and place of the hearing are set, shall give notice informing all qualified voters of the county and other persons interested in the issue of selling or leasing the hospital of the time and place of the hearing and their right to appear at the hearing and to speak for or against the proposed action. The county clerk shall publish notice once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county. The first notice must be published not later than the 15th day before the date set for the hearing. If no newspaper is published in the county, the county clerk shall post the notice at the courthouse door for 14 days before the date set for the hearing.

(d) Ten percent or more of the qualified voters in the county may petition the commissioners court in writing before the time set for the hearing for a referendum on whether the hospital shall be sold or leased or shall continue under county operation. The commissioners court may not sell or lease the hospital unless the proposition to sell or lease the hospital is approved by a majority of the votes cast at the election. The election shall be held under and governed by the election provisions of Section 263.021.

(e) If no petition is filed with the county clerk, the commissioners court may conduct the hearing. Any person interested may appear in person or by attorney. The commissioners court may adjourn the hearing from day to day and from time to time as it considers necessary. On completion of the hearing, the commissioners court may enter an order determining whether or not to sell or lease the hospital. If the court finds that due notice was given, no petition was filed, and the proposed sale or lease is in the best interest of the county, the commissioners court may enter in its minutes an order that the hospital be sold or leased.

(f) The commissioners court may submit the issue of the sale or lease to the voters and withhold its final determination pending the election even if no petition is filed.

(g) The court may sell the hospital or may lease the hospital to be operated as a hospital by the lessee under terms satisfactory to the commissioners court and the lessee. The commissioners court shall enter in its minutes an order of the sale or lease that contains a complete copy of the sales or lease contract.

(h) If 50 qualified property taxpaying voters in a county with a population of 5,000 to 10,390 file a written petition with the commissioners court requesting a referendum on the issue of leasing all or part of the county hospital and if the proposition to lease all or part of the hospital is not approved by a majority of the votes cast at the election, the commissioners court may not lease all or part of the hospital for a period greater than five years.

(i) The commissioners court may deposit all or part of the proceeds from the sale of a county hospital to the credit of a fund to be known as the county health care fund and shall deposit any of the remainder to the credit of the county general fund. The county health care fund may be used only to finance items related to providing health care to county residents, including indigent residents. The commissioners court may deposit to the credit of the county health care fund all or part of the interest from that fund and shall deposit any remainder to the credit of the county general fund.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.030. CLOSING OF HOSPITAL. (a) The commissioners court of a county by order on terms it considers reasonable may close a hospital or medical facility constructed, purchased, or acquired under this chapter.

(b) The order is final 30 days after the date of adoption unless at least 10 percent of the qualified voters in the county petition the commissioners court requesting an election to determine whether the hospital or facility should be closed.

(c) On proper petition, the commissioners court shall set a time for an election and shall submit to the qualified voters of the county ballots providing for voting for or against the proposition: "The closing of (name of hospital or facility to be closed)."

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.031. CLOSING PART OF HOSPITAL. A county may close a part of a county hospital.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER C. BOARD OF MANAGERS

Sec. 263.041. APPOINTMENT OF BOARD OF MANAGERS. (a) The commissioners court of a county shall appoint at least six but not more than 12 residents of the county as the board of managers of a county hospital or medical or other health facility after the court acquires the site for the hospital and awards the contracts for the buildings and improvements necessary for the hospital.

(b) A manager is appointed for a term of two years except that the commissioners court may set the terms of the initial managers at less than two years so that as close as possible to one-half of the managers' terms expire each year.

(c) An appointment to fill a vacancy is for the unexpired term.

(d) A vacancy is created if a manager misses three consecutive board meetings unless the board takes formal action to excuse the absences.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.042. OPERATION OF BOARD OF MANAGERS. (a) The board of managers shall elect from among its members a president, at least one vice-president, a secretary, and a treasurer.

(b) The county judge of the county in which the hospital is located may vote to break a tie vote by the board of managers.

(c) The board of managers shall meet at the hospital at least once a month and may meet at other times as provided by its bylaws.

(d) The board of managers shall hold an annual meeting before the beginning of the third week preceding the date of the meeting of the commissioners court at which the court considers appropriations for the following year.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.043. COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES OF BOARD OF MANAGERS. (a) The commissioners court may provide hospitalization insurance as compensation for the services of the board of managers.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay and audit, in the same manner as other expenses of the hospital, the managers' actual and necessary traveling and other expenses within this state.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.044. TORT CLAIMS PAYMENTS. A member of the board of managers is a county officer for purposes of Chapter 102, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.045. REMOVAL OF MANAGER. After citation, the commissioners court may, at any time, remove a member of the board of managers from office for cause.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.046. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD OF MANAGERS. (a) The board of managers shall generally manage and control the hospital, including:

(1) its buildings and grounds;

(2) its officers and employees;

(3) its patients; and

(4) all matters relating to its government, discipline, contracts, and fiscal concerns.

(b) The board of managers may adopt rules it considers necessary to carry out the purposes of the hospital.

(c) The board of managers shall maintain an effective inspection of the hospital and keep itself informed of the hospital's affairs and management.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.047. SALARIES. (a) The board of managers shall determine the salaries of the officers and employees of the hospital, including the superintendent.

(b) The salaries may not exceed the appropriation made for the salaries by the commissioners court.

(c) The salaries are full compensation for all services rendered.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.048. VISITING PHYSICIANS. (a) The board of managers shall appoint a staff of visiting physicians who visit and treat hospital patients at the request of the board or the superintendent.

(b) The physicians serve without pay from the county.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.049. DISCHARGE OF PATIENTS. (a) The board of managers shall make the final disposition of a case concerning the discharge of a patient from the hospital.

(b) The decision of the board of managers regarding discharge of a patient may not be appealed.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.050. DISPENSARIES AND CLINICS. (a) The board of managers may establish and operate:

(1) an outpatient department or a free dispensary and clinic at the hospital or in the municipality located nearest the hospital; and

(2) a branch dispensary or clinic in a municipality that is located in the county and that has 5,000 or more inhabitants.

(b) The board of managers shall appoint a physician to serve at the dispensary or clinic, determine the time that the physician is required to spend at the dispensary or clinic, and fix the salary, if any, of the physician.

(c) The board of managers shall appoint a trained visiting nurse to serve in connection with the dispensary or clinic and the hospital. The board shall fix the salary of the nurse within the limits of the appropriation made for the salary by the commissioners court.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.051. SCHOOL FOR CHILDREN HAVING TUBERCULOSIS. (a) The board of managers may establish a special and separate school for the education, care, and treatment of children having tuberculosis.

(b) The school may be located at the hospital, in the municipality nearest the hospital, or in the largest municipality in the county.

(c) The school shall be conducted as a branch of the hospital and the children at the school are patients of the hospital and subject to this chapter.

(d) The board of managers shall employ a specially qualified teacher to instruct and care for the children of the school.

(e) The board of managers shall assign the superintendent of the hospital, a member of the staff of visiting physicians, or a physician serving a county dispensary or shall employ a physician to attend the children of the school and to supervise their care and treatment.

(f) The board of managers shall assign a nurse from the hospital or a visiting nurse or shall employ a nurse to assist in the care and treatment of the children of the school.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.052. CONTRACT FOR CARE BY BOARD. The board of managers may contract for the care of a person who is sick or injured and who applies to the hospital for admission. The board may contract for this care with:

(1) a hospital in the county; or

(2) an incorporated society or municipality in the county that maintains a hospital.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.053. RECORDS. (a) The board of managers shall keep a proper record of its proceedings in a book provided for that purpose. The record must be open for inspection at all times to the board, the commissioners court, and any resident of the county.

(b) The board of managers shall certify all bills and accounts, including salaries and wages, and transmit them to the commissioners court, which shall provide for their payment in the same manner that other charges against the county are paid.

(c) The board of managers shall report to the commissioners court annually, and at other times as directed by the court, on the details of the operation during the year of the hospital dispensaries and school for children suffering from tuberculosis. The report must contain:

(1) the number of patients admitted and the methods and result of their treatment, together with suitable recommendations and other material required by the court; and

(2) full and detailed estimates of the appropriations required during the following year for all purposes, including maintenance, building construction, repairs, renewals, extensions, and improvements.

(d) The board of managers shall incorporate into its report to the commissioners court the accounts and records prepared by the superintendent of the hospital under Section 263.077.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER D. SUPERINTENDENT

Sec. 263.071. APPOINTMENT OF SUPERINTENDENT. (a) The board of managers shall appoint a superintendent of the hospital who holds office at the pleasure of the board.

(b) The superintendent may not be a member of the board of managers and must be a qualified practitioner of medicine or be specially trained for the work of a superintendent.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.072. ROLE OF SUPERINTENDENT. (a) The superintendent is the chief executive officer of the hospital.

(b) The superintendent is subject to the bylaws and rules of the hospital and to the board of managers.

(c) The board of managers shall determine the amount of time that a superintendent must spend at the hospital in the performance of the superintendent's duties.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.073. BOND. The superintendent, before beginning to discharge the duties of office, shall give a bond in a sum determined by the board of managers to secure the faithful performance of the superintendent's duties.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.074. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF SUPERINTENDENT. (a) The superintendent has general supervision and control of:

(1) the records and accounts of the hospital;

(2) the hospital buildings; and

(3) the internal affairs of the hospital, including discipline.

(b) The superintendent shall enforce the bylaws and rules adopted by the board of managers for the government, discipline, and management of the hospital and its employees and patients.

(c) The superintendent may adopt additional rules and orders the superintendent considers necessary that are not inconsistent with law or the rules and directions of the board of managers.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.075. EQUIPPING THE HOSPITAL. (a) The superintendent shall, with the consent of the board of managers, equip the hospital with furniture, appliances, fixtures, and other facilities necessary for the care and treatment of patients and the use of officers and employees.

(b) The superintendent shall purchase all supplies necessary for the hospital.

(c) Expenditures under this section may not exceed the amount provided for them by the commissioners court.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.076. OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES. (a) With the consent of the board of managers, the superintendent shall appoint resident officers and employees considered proper and necessary by the superintendent for the efficient performance of the hospital's business.

(b) The superintendent shall determine the duties of the officers and employees of the hospital.

(c) The superintendent may discharge an officer or employee at the discretion of the superintendent for cause stated in writing after an opportunity for a hearing.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.077. ACCOUNTS AND RECORDS. (a) The superintendent shall require daily accounts and records of the hospital's business and operations.

(b) The superintendent shall require that:

(1) a record is kept of the condition of a patient on and after admission; and

(2) proper records and accounts are kept of the admission of a patient, including the patient's name, age, sex, color, marital condition, residence, occupation, and place of past employment.

(c) The superintendent shall present the accounts and records to the board of managers in an annual report.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.078. FORMS FOR ADMISSION. (a) The county hospital shall provide forms for application for admission to the hospital and the superintendent shall forward the forms free to a licensed physician in the county in which the hospital is located at the request of the physician.

(b) An application for admission to a county hospital must be made, if practicable, on a form provided under this section.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.079. ADMISSION OF PERSONS FROM COUNTY. (a) A resident of a county in which a county hospital is located who desires treatment in the hospital may apply in person to the superintendent or to a licensed physician for examination. If the physician finds that the resident is sick or injured, the physician may apply to the superintendent for admission of the resident.

(b) After the superintendent receives an application for admission to the hospital, the superintendent shall notify the applicant to appear in person at the hospital if:

(1) it appears from the application that the applicant is sick or injured; and

(2) there is a vacancy in the hospital.

(c) The superintendent, acting under the general direction of the board of managers, shall admit an applicant for admission to the hospital in order of application or according to the urgency of need of treatment if:

(1) after a personal examination of the applicant, the superintendent is satisfied that the applicant is sick or injured; and

(2) the applicant resides in the county at the time of the application for admission to the hospital.

(d) An application for admission must state whether, in the judgment of the physician, the applicant is able to pay, in whole or in part, for the applicant's care and treatment while in the hospital.

(e) An application must be filed and recorded in a book kept for that purpose in the order it is received.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.080. ADMISSION OF PERSONS FROM ADJACENT COUNTY. The superintendent shall admit to the hospital a person sent by the commissioners court of an adjacent county if:

(1) the adjacent county has contracted with the board of managers for the care and treatment of persons who are sick or injured;

(2) the person resides in the adjacent county at the time of the application for admission to the hospital; and

(3) there is sufficient provision for the care of persons who are sick or injured and who reside in the county in which the hospital is located.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.081. CONDITION AND TREATMENT OF PATIENT. The superintendent shall require that a patient's physical condition is carefully examined and the treatment the patient needs is provided.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.082. PAYMENT BY PATIENT. (a) A patient may not be permitted to pay an amount for the patient's maintenance in the hospital greater than the average per capita cost of maintenance in the hospital, including a reasonable allowance for the interest on the cost of the hospital.

(b) An officer or employee of a county hospital may not accept from a patient a fee, payment, or gratuity for any service.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.083. SUPPORT. (a) The superintendent shall inquire into a patient's circumstances and the circumstances of the patient's relatives legally responsible for the patient's support if the patient is admitted to the hospital from the county in which the hospital is located. If the superintendent finds that the patient or the patient's relatives are liable to pay for the patient's care and treatment in whole or in part, the superintendent shall issue an order directing the patient or the patient's relatives to pay to the treasurer of the hospital a specified amount each week in proportion to the financial ability of the patient or the patient's relatives to pay.

(b) A patient or the patient's relatives may not be required to pay an amount greater than the actual per capita cost of maintenance.

(c) A superintendent may collect an amount owed under this section from the estate of a patient, or the relatives legally responsible for the patient's support, in the manner provided by law for the collection of expenses of the last illness of a decedent.

(d) A county court of the county in which a patient's hospital is located shall hear and determine the ability of the patient or the patient's relatives to pay under this section if there is a dispute over that ability or if there is doubt in the mind of the superintendent of the hospital over that ability. The court shall hear witnesses and issue any order that may be proper. The order may not be appealed.

(e) Discrimination in the accommodations, care, or treatment of a patient may not be made because the patient or the patient's relatives contribute to the cost, in whole or in part, of the patient's maintenance.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.084. DISCHARGE OF PATIENTS. (a) The superintendent shall temporarily or permanently discharge a patient from the hospital if the patient:

(1) is not sick or injured or recovers from the sickness or injury;

(2) wilfully or habitually violates hospital rules; or

(3) is not suitable for treatment for any other reason.

(b) The superintendent shall make a full report of a discharge of a patient from the hospital at the next meeting of the board of managers after the discharge.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 263.085. COLLECTION OF MONEY. (a) The superintendent shall collect money due the hospital.

(b) The superintendent shall keep an accurate account of money collected at the hospital, report at the monthly meeting of the board of managers the amount of money collected, and transmit the money to the county treasurer of the county in which the hospital is located within 10 days after the date of the meeting of the board.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER E. ENFORCEMENT AND DISSEMINATION OF INFORMATION

Sec. 263.101. INSPECTIONS. (a) A resident officer of a county hospital shall admit a member of the board of managers into every part of the hospital and its premises.

(b) On the demand of a member of the board of managers, a resident officer of the hospital shall:

(1) give the board access to all books, papers, accounts, and other records pertaining to the hospital; and

(2) furnish the board with copies, abstracts, and reports.

(c) A hospital established or maintained under this chapter is subject to inspection by an authorized representative of:

(1) the Department of State Health Services;

(2) the commissioners court; or

(3) a state board of charities, if such a board is created.

(d) A resident officer of a county hospital shall admit a representative listed in Subsection (c) into every part of the hospital and its buildings.

(e) On the demand of a representative listed in Subsection (c), a resident officer of the hospital shall give the representative access to all books, papers, accounts, reports, and other records pertaining to the hospital.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0825, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 263.102. RULES AND PUBLICATIONS. (a) The board of managers shall print, or purchase from the Department of State Health Services at the actual cost of printing:

(1) rules adopted by the executive commissioner for the care of persons having a communicable disease and for the prevention and spread of communicable disease; and

(2) bulletins and other publications prepared by the department providing information about the cause, nature, treatment, and prevention of disease.

(b) The board of managers shall send or deliver copies of those rules, bulletins, and publications to:

(1) all practicing physicians in the county in which the hospital is located;

(2) all public schools;

(3) private schools that request copies; and

(4) organizations, churches, societies, unions, and individuals who present a written request for copies.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0826, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0827, eff. April 2, 2015.